Massachusetts, session 194th, H1484.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of said chapter 40A, as so appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking the eleventh paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following
paragraph:-
No zoning ordinance or by-law shall prohibit, unreasonably restrict or require a special
permit or other discretionary zoning approval for the use of land or structures for a single
accessory dwelling unit, or the rental thereof, in a single-family residential zoning district;
provided, that the use of land or structures for such accessory dwelling unit under this paragraph
may be subject to reasonable regulations, including, but not limited to, 310 CMR 15.000 et seq.,
if applicable, site plan review, regulations concerning dimensional setbacks and the bulk and
height of structures and may be subject to restrictions and prohibitions on short-term rental, as
defined in section 1 of chapter 64G. Any city or town may, by local option, require owner
occupancy of either the accessory dwelling unit or the principal dwelling unit under this
paragraph; provided, that not more than 1 additional parking space shall be required for an
of 2

accessory dwelling unit; and provided further, that no additional parking space shall be required
for an accessory dwelling located not more than 0.5 miles from a commuter rail station, subway
station, ferry terminal or bus station. For more than 1 accessory dwelling unit, or rental thereof,
in a single-family residential zoning district there shall be a special permit for the use of land or
structures for an accessory dwelling unit. The executive office of housing and livable
communities may issue guidelines or promulgate regulations to administer this paragraph
of 2